Hawaii statutes.
§414-53 Administrative order of abatement
for infringement of corporate name. (a) Any domestic corporation in good
standing or foreign corporation authorized to do business in this State
claiming that the name of any entity registered or authorized to transact
business under the laws of this State is substantially identical to, or
confusingly similar to, its name may file a petition with the department
director for an administrative order of abatement to address the infringement
of its name. The petition shall set forth the facts and authority that support
the petitioner's claim that further use of the name should be abated. The
petitioner, at the petitioner's expense, shall notify the registrant of the
hearing in the manner prescribed by chapter 91 and the registrant shall be
given an opportunity to respond to the petition at the hearing. The notice
shall be made and the hearing held in accordance with the contested case
provisions of chapter 91.

(b) In addition to any other remedy or
sanction allowed by law, the order of abatement may:

(1) Allow the entity to retain its registered name,
but:

(A) Require the entity to register a new
trade name with the department director; and

(B) Require the entity to conduct business in
this State under this new trade name; or

(2) (A) Require the entity to change its
registered name;

(B) Require the entity to register the new
name with the department director; and

(C) Require the entity to conduct business in
this State under its new name.

If the entity fails to comply with the order of
abatement within sixty days, the department director may involuntarily dissolve
or terminate the entity, or cancel or revoke the entity's registration or
certificate of authority; after the time to appeal has lapsed and no appeal has
been timely filed. The department director shall mail notice of the
dissolution, termination, or cancellation to the entity at its last known
mailing address. The entity shall wind up its affairs in accordance with this
chapter or chapter 414D, 415A, 425, 425E, or 428, as applicable.

(c) Any person aggrieved by the department
director's order under this section may obtain judicial review in accordance
with chapter 91 by filing a notice of appeal in circuit court within thirty
days after the issuance of the department director's order. The trial by the
circuit court of any such proceeding shall be de novo. Review of any final
judgment of the circuit court under this section shall be governed by chapter
602. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §15; am L 2002, c 40, §40; am
L 2003, c 210, §5]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next